Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 1. Chesapeake Bay Watershed Implementation Plan.

§ 62.1-44.119.
(For contingent effective date, see § 62.1-44.119:1) Target date.

In recognition of the ecological, cultural, economic, historical, and recreational value of the Chesapeake Bay, as well as the Commonwealth’s commitment to the Chesapeake Bay Partnership and the 2014 Chesapeake Bay Agreement, the target date to achieve the water quality goals contained in Virginia’s final Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan shall be December 31, 2025.

History.

2020, cc. 1185, 1186.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 3 provides: “That the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture (the Secretaries) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group (the Group) to review annual progress toward the implementation of the Commonwealth’s agricultural commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan. The Group shall (i) develop a process to assist any operator of 50 or more acres of Chesapeake Bay cropland in developing a nutrient management plan that meets the requirements of the goals to be achieved by the target date and (ii) develop a plan for the stream exclusion program in the Chesapeake Bay watershed. Such plans and progress reports shall include identification of priority regions, operators affected within each region, initiatives to enhance progress, an accounting of funding received toward the agricultural commitments, shortfalls remaining, and the consequences of such funding shortfalls. The Group shall make recommendations to the Governor regarding necessary revisions to Chapter 3.8 (§

62.1-44.119

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, to ensure that the Commonwealth’s commitments are achieved by December 31, 2025. The Group shall include representatives from the Department of Conservation and Recreation, soil and water conservation districts, the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, the Chesapeake Bay Commission, the Chesapeake Bay Foundation, the Virginia Cooperative Extension, the Virginia Cattlemen’s Association, the Virginia Association of the Commissioners of the Revenue, and the Virginia Association of Counties. The Group shall also include two legislative members, one each from the Senate and the House of Delegates. Such legislative members shall be members of the Virginia delegation of the Chesapeake Bay Commission.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall, no later than July 1, 2021, establish through the Soil and Water Conservation Technical Advisory Committee and with stakeholder input a portable stream fencing practice for inclusion in the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practice Cost-Share Program.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, c. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, as established pursuant to § 10.1-502 of the Code of Virginia, shall establish, no later than December 31, 2020, the methodology for identifying perennial streams, as defined in §

62.1-44.122

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 2 provides: “That the Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program as established in subdivisions G 1, 2, and 3 of §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be deemed to implement through January 1, 2026, the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan in lieu of the floating waste load allocation concept proposed in Initiative 52 of the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan. However, nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the State Water Control Board’s authority to impose (i) additional requirements or modifications to phosphorous waste load allocations necessary to achieve compliance with the numeric chlorophyll-a criteria applicable to the James River; (ii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with changes to federal law that become effective after January 1, 2021; or (iii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with a court order issued after January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 4 provides: “That if the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources (the Secretary) determines on or after July 1, 2026, that the Commonwealth has not achieved, or in the event of increased nutrient loads associated with climate change will not be able to maintain, its nitrogen pollution reduction commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan, the Secretary may develop an additional watershed implementation plan or plans pursuant to §

2.2-218

of the Code of Virginia. Any such plan shall take into consideration the progress made by all point and nonpoint sources toward meeting applicable load and waste load allocations, the best available science and water quality modeling, and any applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency guidance for Chesapeake Bay TMDL implementation. In any such plan, the Secretary may include as priority projects upgrades with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L annual average total nitrogen concentration at municipal wastewater treatment facilities with a design capacity greater than 10.0 MGD discharging to James River Segment JMSTF2 so long as (i) the scheduled date for compliance is January 1, 2036; (ii) notwithstanding the wasteload allocations specified in clause (iii), compliance requires operating the nutrient removal technology to achieve an annual average total nitrogen concentration of less than or equal to 4.0 mg/L or, until such time as the facility is upgraded to achieve such concentration, the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load based on an annual average total nitrogen concentration of 4.0 mg/L and actual annual flow treated, including the use of point source nitrogen credits; and (iii) the facilities have and retain the following total nitrogen waste load allocations: Falling Creek WWTP (182,738 lbs/year), Proctors Creek WWTP (411,151 lbs/year and, in the event that Proctors Creek WWTP is expanded in accordance with 9VAC25-40-70 and Falling Creek WWTP is upgraded to achieve 4.0 mg/L, 493,391 lbs/year), and Henrico County WWTP (1,142,085 lbs/year). If the Secretary opts to include such facilities in the plan, the State Water Control Board shall include the foregoing concentrations limits, waste load allocations, and schedules for compliance in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation, the Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, and individual VPDES permits, as applicable.”

§ 62.1-44.119:1.
Effective date.

The provisions of this chapter shall not become effective unless, on or after July 1, 2026, the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry and the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources jointly determine that the Commonwealth’s commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan have not been satisfied by a combination of agricultural best management conservation practices, including the coverage of a sufficient portion of Chesapeake Bay cropland by nutrient management plans or the installation of a sufficient number of livestock stream exclusion practices.

History.

2020, cc. 1185, 1186; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 2 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 3 provides: “That the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture (the Secretaries) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group (the Group) to review annual progress toward the implementation of the Commonwealth’s agricultural commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan. The Group shall (i) develop a process to assist any operator of 50 or more acres of Chesapeake Bay cropland in developing a nutrient management plan that meets the requirements of the goals to be achieved by the target date and (ii) develop a plan for the stream exclusion program in the Chesapeake Bay watershed. Such plans and progress reports shall include identification of priority regions, operators affected within each region, initiatives to enhance progress, an accounting of funding received toward the agricultural commitments, shortfalls remaining, and the consequences of such funding shortfalls. The Group shall make recommendations to the Governor regarding necessary revisions to Chapter 3.8 (§

62.1-44.119

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, to ensure that the Commonwealth’s commitments are achieved by December 31, 2025. The Group shall include representatives from the Department of Conservation and Recreation, soil and water conservation districts, the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, the Chesapeake Bay Commission, the Chesapeake Bay Foundation, the Virginia Cooperative Extension, the Virginia Cattlemen’s Association, the Virginia Association of the Commissioners of the Revenue, and the Virginia Association of Counties. The Group shall also include two legislative members, one each from the Senate and the House of Delegates. Such legislative members shall be members of the Virginia delegation of the Chesapeake Bay Commission.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall, no later than July 1, 2021, establish through the Soil and Water Conservation Technical Advisory Committee and with stakeholder input a portable stream fencing practice for inclusion in the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practice Cost-Share Program.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1185 and 1186, cl. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, as established pursuant to § 10.1-502 of the Code of Virginia, shall establish, no later than December 31, 2020, the methodology for identifying perennial streams, as defined in §

62.1-44.122

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 2 provides: “That the Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program as established in subdivisions G 1, 2, and 3 of §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be deemed to implement through January 1, 2026, the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan in lieu of the floating waste load allocation concept proposed in Initiative 52 of the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan. However, nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the State Water Control Board’s authority to impose (i) additional requirements or modifications to phosphorous waste load allocations necessary to achieve compliance with the numeric chlorophyll-a criteria applicable to the James River; (ii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with changes to federal law that become effective after January 1, 2021; or (iii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with a court order issued after January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 4 provides: “That if the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources (the Secretary) determines on or after July 1, 2026, that the Commonwealth has not achieved, or in the event of increased nutrient loads associated with climate change will not be able to maintain, its nitrogen pollution reduction commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan, the Secretary may develop an additional watershed implementation plan or plans pursuant to §

2.2-218

of the Code of Virginia. Any such plan shall take into consideration the progress made by all point and nonpoint sources toward meeting applicable load and waste load allocations, the best available science and water quality modeling, and any applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency guidance for Chesapeake Bay TMDL implementation. In any such plan, the Secretary may include as priority projects upgrades with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L annual average total nitrogen concentration at municipal wastewater treatment facilities with a design capacity greater than 10.0 MGD discharging to James River Segment JMSTF2 so long as (i) the scheduled date for compliance is January 1, 2036; (ii) notwithstanding the wasteload allocations specified in clause (iii), compliance requires operating the nutrient removal technology to achieve an annual average total nitrogen concentration of less than or equal to 4.0 mg/L or, until such time as the facility is upgraded to achieve such concentration, the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load based on an annual average total nitrogen concentration of 4.0 mg/L and actual annual flow treated, including the use of point source nitrogen credits; and (iii) the facilities have and retain the following total nitrogen waste load allocations: Falling Creek WWTP (182,738 lbs/year), Proctors Creek WWTP (411,151 lbs/year and, in the event that Proctors Creek WWTP is expanded in accordance with 9VAC25-40-70 and Falling Creek WWTP is upgraded to achieve 4.0 mg/L, 493,391 lbs/year), and Henrico County WWTP (1,142,085 lbs/year). If the Secretary opts to include such facilities in the plan, the State Water Control Board shall include the foregoing concentrations limits, waste load allocations, and schedules for compliance in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation, the Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, and individual VPDES permits, as applicable.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic.”